District of Columbia statutes.
11-2608

Authorization of appropriations.

There are authorized to be appropriated for payment to the Joint Committee on Judicial Administration in the District of Columbia such sums as may be necessary to pay for representation by private attorneys and related services under this chapter. When so specified in appropriation Acts, such appropriations shall remain available until expended.

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1093, Pub. L. 93-412, § 2
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-69, § 2, 23 DCR 531
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 105-033, § 11262(b)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2425, Pub. L. 105-274, § 6(b)(1)
1981 Ed., § 11-2608.
1973 Ed., § 11-2608.